California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(3) For the purposes of paragraph (2), per diem, travel and other necessary expenses shall be funded equally by the commission and the Energy Commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 567, Sec. 1.   (SB 1369)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

400.2.

For the purposes of this article, “green electrolytic hydrogen” means hydrogen gas produced through electrolysis and does not include hydrogen gas manufactured using steam reforming or any other conversion technology that produces hydrogen from a fossil fuel feedstock.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 567, Sec. 2.   (SB 1369)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

400.3.

The commission, State Air Resources Board, and Energy Commission shall consider green electrolytic hydrogen an eligible form of energy storage and shall consider other potential uses of green electrolytic hydrogen in their decarbonization strategies. For purposes of this section, “decarbonization strategies” means actions undertaken to reduce or eliminate emissions of greenhouse gases.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 363, Sec. 4.   (SB 1075)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.5. Public Utilities Commission Reimbursement Fees [401. - 444.]



  ARTICLE 1. Collection and Disposition of Fees [401. - 410.]

401.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that the public interest is best served by a commission that is appropriately funded and staffed, that can thoroughly examine the issues before it, and that can take timely and well-considered action on matters before it. The Legislature further finds and declares that funding the commission by means of a reasonable fee imposed upon each common carrier and business related thereto, each public utility that the commission regulates, and each applicant for, or holder of, a state franchise pursuant to Division 2.5 (commencing with Section 5800), helps to achieve those goals and is, therefore, in the public interest.

(b) The Legislature intends, in enacting this chapter, that the fees levied and collected pursuant thereto produce enough, and only enough, revenues to fund the commission with (1) its authorized expenditures for each fiscal year to regulate common carriers and businesses related thereto, public utilities, and applicants and holders of a state franchise to be a video service provider, less the amount to be paid from special accounts except those established by this article, reimbursements, federal funds, and the unencumbered balance from the preceding year; (2) an appropriate reserve; and (3) any adjustment appropriated by the Legislature.

(c) For purposes of this chapter, an “appropriate reserve” means a reserve in addition to the commission’s total authorized annual budget to regulate common carriers and related businesses, public utilities, and applicants and holders of a state franchise to be a video service provider, to be determined by the commission based on its past and projected operating experience.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 700, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

402.

The Public Utilities Commission Utilities Reimbursement Account is hereby continued in existence. All fees collected by the commission pursuant to Section 431 shall be transmitted to the Treasurer at least quarterly for deposit in the account.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 323, Sec. 71.   Effective July 1, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

403.

There is hereby created the Public Utilities Commission Transportation Reimbursement Account in the General Fund. All fees collected by the commission pursuant to Section 421 shall be transmitted to the Treasurer at least quarterly for deposit in the account.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 323, Sec. 71.   Effective July 1, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

404.

(a) All fees paid pursuant to this chapter, exclusive of any penalties for delinquency, shall be allowed by the commission in a separate order as an ordinary operating expense for purposes of establishing rates or charges. The commission shall authorize each person or corporation subject to Section 421 or 431 to annually adjust its rates or charges for intrastate services so as to collect from its customers and subscribers an amount sufficient to pay the amount of the fee required by Section 421 or 431 together with the costs of collecting the fee from each customer or subscriber. 

(b) The commission shall adopt rules to determine the appropriate level of fees for carriers that provide transportation services incidental to commercial balloon operations, commercial river rafting, or skiing.

(c) Each person or corporation subject to Section 421 or 431 may identify separately, on the bill of each customer or subscriber, the amount to be paid by each customer or subscriber for purposes of funding the commission pursuant to this chapter.

(d) Persons or corporations subject to Section 421 or 431 shall pay the fee in accordance with Section 423 or 433 after collection from their customers or subscribers.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 636, Sec. 1) by Stats. 1993, Ch. 125, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

405.

If any person or corporation subject to this chapter is in default of the preparation and submission of any report or the payment of any fee required by this chapter for a period of 30 days or more, the commission may suspend or revoke the certificate of public convenience and necessity, permit, or other operating authority of the person or corporation or order the person or corporation to cease and desist from conducting all operations subject to the jurisdiction of the commission, and the commission may estimate from all available information the appropriate fee and may add to the amount of that estimated fee a penalty not to exceed 25 percent of the amount on account of the failure, refusal, or neglect to prepare and submit the report or to pay the fee, and the person or corporation shall be estopped to complain of the amount of the commission’s estimate.

Upon payment of the fee so estimated and penalty, if applicable, the certificate, permit, or other operating authority of the person or corporation suspended in accordance with this section shall be reinstated or the order to cease and desist revoked. The commission may grant a reasonable extension of the 30-day period to any person or corporation upon written application and a showing of the necessity of the extension.

Upon revocation of any certificate, permit, or other operating authority or issuance of an order to cease and desist pursuant to this section, all fees in default shall become due and payable immediately.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 323, Sec. 71.   Effective July 1, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

406.

The commission may bring an action, in its own name or in the name of the people of the state, in any court of competent jurisdiction, for the collection of delinquent fees estimated under Section 405, or for an amount due, owing, and unpaid to it, as shown by report filed by the commission, together with a penalty of 25 percent for the delinquency.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 323, Sec. 71.   Effective July 1, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

407.

The commission shall authorize refunds of the fees provided for in this chapter when the fees were collected in error.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 323, Sec. 71.   Effective July 1, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

408.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all fees and charges collected by the commission pursuant to this code from each common carrier and related business subject to Section 421 and from interstate or foreign highway carriers registered pursuant to the Interstate and Foreign Highway Carriers’ Registration Act (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 3901) of Division 2), shall be deposited in the Public Utilities Commission Transportation Reimbursement Account, in addition to the fee authorized by Section 421.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 323, Sec. 71.   Effective July 1, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

409.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all fees and charges collected pursuant to this code by the commission from each public utility subject to Section 431, with the exception of any penalty collected pursuant to Section 405 or 406, shall be deposited in the Public Utilities Commission Utilities Reimbursement Account, in addition to the fee authorized by Section 431.

(b) A penalty collected pursuant to Section 405 or 406 shall be deposited in the General Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1147, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

409.5.

The commission shall maintain those records as are necessary to account separately for all fees and charges, including the fees authorized by Section 431, received from each class of utility subject to Article 3 (commencing with Section 431) and remitted pursuant to Section 409.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1035, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

410.

The commission may establish rules and regulations that it deems necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 323, Sec. 71.   Effective July 1, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Common Carriers and Related Businesses [421. - 426.]

421.

(a) The commission shall annually determine a fee to be paid by every passenger stage corporation, charter-party carrier of passengers, pipeline corporation, for-hire vessel operator, common carrier vessel operator, railroad corporation, and commercial air operator, and every other common carrier and related business subject to the jurisdiction of the commission, except as otherwise provided in Article 3 (commencing with Section 431) of this chapter and Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 5001) of Division 2.

(b) The annual fee shall be established to produce a total amount equal to the amount established in the authorized commission budget for the same year, including adjustments
 appropriated by the Legislature and an appropriate reserve, to regulate common
 carriers and related businesses, less the amount to be paid from special accounts or funds pursuant to Section 403, reimbursements, federal funds, other revenues, and unencumbered funds from the preceding year.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the fees paid by railroad corporations shall be used for state-funded railroad investigation and enforcement activities of the commission, other than the rail safety activities funded by the Transportation Planning and Development Account pursuant to Section 99315. The railroad fees shall be set annually at a level that generates not less than the amount sufficient to fund activities pursuant to Sections 765.5, 916.2, and 7712.

(d) Expenditures of the detailed budget for the expenditure of railroad
 corporation fees submitted to the Legislature pursuant to Section 916.5 shall be limited to the following items:

(1) Expenditures for employees occupying, and actually performing service in, railroad-safety personnel positions that are directly involved in inspecting railroads and enforcing rail safety regulations. The commission shall expend the funds budgeted pursuant to this subdivision for the salaries, per diem, and travel expenses of employees specified in this paragraph, unless, by statute, the commission is specifically prohibited from expending all or part of those funds.

(2) Expenditures for employees occupying, and actually performing service in, clerical and support staff positions that are directly associated with railroad-safety inspections.

(3) Expenditures for legal personnel who actually pursue violations of rail safety regulations beyond the informal complaint level.

(4) Expenditures for the pro rata share of the commission’s overhead costs while state personnel are actually occupying the positions and are performing the duties specified in paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive.

(e) The Department of Finance shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, pursuant to Section 28.00 of the annual Budget Act, prior to authorizing any change in the Budget Act appropriation for railroad corporation fees that is larger than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), or 10 percent of the amount budgeted, whichever is less.

(f) On or before January 1, 1994, the commission shall hire a minimum of four additional operating practices inspectors, exclusive of supervisory personnel, who are, or shall become by July 1, 1994, federally certified, for the purpose of enforcing compliance by railroads operating in this state with state and federal safety regulations.

(g) The commission, in performing its duties, shall limit the expenditure of funds for rail safety purposes to those railroad corporation fees collected pursuant to subdivision (d). In no event shall the commission fund railroad safety activities utilizing funds from other commission accounts unrelated to railroad safety.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 425, Sec. 2.   (SB 385)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

422.

The commission shall establish the fee pursuant to Section 421 with the approval of the Department of Finance and in accordance with all of the following:

(a) In its annual budget request, the commission shall specify, at a minimum, both of the following:

(1) The amount of its budget to be financed by the fee. 

(2) The dollar allocation of the amount of its budget to be financed by the fee by each class of carrier and related business subject to the fee. Each class of carrier and related business subject to this article shall pay fees sufficient to support the commission’s regulatory activities for the class from which the fee is collected and to establish an appropriate reserve. 

(b) The commission may establish different and distinct methods of assessing fees for each class of carrier and related business, if the revenues collected are consistent with paragraph (2) of subdivision (a). 

(c) (1) Within each class of carrier and related business subject to the fee, the commission shall allocate, among the members of the class, the amount of the commission’s budget to be financed by the fee based on the ratio that each member’s gross intrastate revenues bears to the total gross intrastate revenues of the class, except for railroad corporations, whose fees shall be allocated within that class in accordance with subdivision (g).

(2) However, in the case of passenger vehicle operators, the commission may assess fees on a basis other than revenue, including, but not limited to, on a per vehicle basis, in an amount sufficient to support the regulatory activities of the commission for the passenger vehicle operators class from which the fee is collected, and to establish an appropriate reserve.

(d) Any carrier or related business which is a member of more than one class of carrier or related business shall be subject to the fee for each class of which it is a member. 

(e) For every carrier and related business having annual gross intrastate revenues of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or less, or for every railroad corporation having annual gross intrastate revenues of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) or less, the commission shall annually establish uniform fees, which shall be not less than a minimum annual fee, to be paid by each carrier and related business and by each railroad corporation, if the revenues collected are consistent with paragraph (2) of subdivision (a). Every carrier and related business and railroad corporation paying fees pursuant to this subdivision shall show proof of eligibility at the time of payment in a form the commission may specify. 

(f) The commission shall annually establish a uniform fee, which shall be not less than a minimum annual fee, to be paid by every commercial air operator and for-hire vessel operator, if the revenues collected are consistent with paragraph (2) of subdivision (a). 

(g) The commission shall establish the initial fee amount to be paid by railroad corporations subject to this section, and the regulations for the assessment and collection of the fee, no later than January 31, 1992. The commission shall collect the initial fee from railroad corporations beginning on February 1, 1992, and shall disburse the amounts collected as directed in Section 309.7, as added by Assembly Bill 684 of the 1991–92 Regular Session, and Section 421. 

(h) The commission shall establish regulations for allocating the proportionate share of the fee established pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) to be paid by the rail corporations within that class. The regulations may utilize gross intrastate revenues; track mileage within the state; terminals located within the state; loaded car miles traveled within the state; fuel consumption; or any other measure deemed by the commission to be appropriate in allocating the fee among railroad corporations. On or before January 15, 1992, railroad corporations as a group may submit a proposed plan of allocation to the commission, which the commission shall consider in establishing the regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 341, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

422.1.

In addition to the requirements of Section 422, the commission may establish a uniform annual fee to be paid by every charter-party carrier of passengers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1369, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

423.

Except as provided in Section 404, every carrier and related business subject to Section 421 shall make the payments of the required fee in accordance with the following schedule:

(a) Every carrier and related business with annual gross intrastate revenues of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or less, railroad corporation, commercial air operator, and for-hire vessel operator shall make payment of the fee to the commission on an annual basis on or before January 15. 

(b) Every other carrier and related business not subject to subdivision (a) shall make payment of the fee on a quarterly basis between the first and 15th days of July, October, January, and April. 

(c) Each carrier and related business subject to subdivision (b) shall, at that time, prepare and transmit a report, in the form the commission may specify, showing the gross operating revenue of the carrier or related business for the calendar quarter covered by the report together with the fee established pursuant to Section 421. In the case of a railroad corporation, the report shall address the factors identified by the commission as the basis for allocation pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 422. 

(d) Any carrier or related business required to submit information and reports under this article may, in lieu thereof, submit copies of information or reports made to another governmental agency if all of the following requirements are met: 

(1) The alternate information or reports contain all of the information required by the commission. 

(2) The requirements to which the alternate information or reports are responsive are clearly identified. 

(3) The information or reports are certified by the carrier or related business to be true and correct.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 767, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

424.

As used in this article:

(a) “Class” means a group of carriers or related businesses as specified by the commission for purposes of establishing the fees pursuant to this article. The commission shall create separate classes for the following: passenger vehicle operators, pipeline corporations, vessel operators, railroad corporations, and commercial air operators. Nothing in this section restricts the commission from establishing other carrier classes or from establishing other classes within the existing classes listed in this section, including classes based on the kinds of vehicles used.

(b) “Gross intrastate revenue” includes all compensation for the transportation or storage of property or the transportation of persons when both the origin and destination of the transportation or the performance of the service is within this state, and shall not include compensation for the transportation of persons or property in interstate or foreign commerce or the transportation of vehicles by ferries. “Gross intrastate revenue,” as determined pursuant to this article, shall apply only for purposes of determining the fees required by this chapter and shall not necessarily constitute gross operating revenue for any other purpose. 

(c) “Fee” means that monetary amount determined in accordance with this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 341, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

425.

The employees, representatives, and inspectors of the commission may, under its order or direction, inspect and examine any books, accounts, records, memoranda, documents, papers, and correspondence kept or required to be kept by any carrier or related business referred to in this article. This section shall, to the extent deemed necessary by the commission, apply to persons who have direct or indirect control over, or who are affiliated with, any transportation agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 323, Sec. 71.   Effective July 1, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

426.

The commission shall use all moneys paid into the Public Utilities Commission Transportation Reimbursement Account by charter-party carriers in connection with charter bus transportation, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 5363, solely for the following purposes:

(a) Safety regulation.

(b) The administration of financial responsibility requirements.

(c) Commission activities to ensure compliance with safety regulation and financial responsibility requirements.

(d) Any other regulatory program permitted by Section 14501(a) of Title 49 of the United States Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 1005, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Other Public Utilities [431. - 435.]

431.

(a) The commission shall annually determine a fee to be paid by every electrical, gas, telephone, telegraph, water, sewer system, and heat corporation and every other public utility providing service directly to customers or subscribers and subject to the jurisdiction of the commission other than a railroad, except as otherwise provided in Article 2 (commencing with Section 421). 

(b) The annual fee shall be established to produce a total amount equal to that amount established in the authorized commission budget for the same year, including adjustments for increases in employee compensation, other increases appropriated by the Legislature,
 and an appropriate reserve to regulate public utilities less the amount to be paid from special accounts or funds pursuant to Section 402, reimbursements, federal funds, and any other revenues, and the amount of unencumbered funds from the preceding year. 

(c) This article shall not apply to any electrical cooperative as defined in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2776) of Part 2. 

(d) On and after January 1, 1985, this article shall apply to radiotelephone utilities as defined in Section 4902 as those provisions read on December 31, 1984. 

(e) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2020.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 2) and added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 885, Sec. 3.   (AB 1717)   Effective September 30, 2014.   Section operative January 1, 2020, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

432.

The commission shall establish the fee pursuant to Section 431 with the approval of the Department of Finance and in accordance with all of the following:

(a) In its annual budget request, the commission shall specify both of the following:

(1) The amount of its budget to be financed by the fee.

(2) The dollar allocation of the amount of its budget shall be financed by the fee by each class of public utility subject to the fee. The fee allocation among classes of public utilities shall reflect expenditures by the commission on regulatory and other authorized activities affecting each respective class, and shall bear the same ratio that the commission’s workload for each class of public utility subject to the fee bears to the commission’s total workload for all public utilities subject to the fee.

(b) The commission may establish different and distinct methods of assessing fees for each class of public utility, if the revenues collected are consistent with paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), except that the commission shall establish a uniform charge per kilowatt hour for sales in kilowatt hours for the class of electrical corporations and a uniform charge per therm for sales in therms for the class of gas corporations.

(c) Within each class of public utility subject to the fee, the commission shall allocate among the members of the class the amount of its budget to be financed by the fee using the following methods:

(1) For electrical corporations, the ratio that each corporation’s sales in kilowatt hours bears to the total sales in kilowatt hours for the class.

(2) For gas corporations, the ratio that each corporation’s sales in therms bears to the total sales in therms for the class.

(3) For telephone and telegraph corporations, the ratio that each corporation’s gross intrastate revenues bears to the total gross intrastate revenues for the class. If the commission determines that there is a need for consultants or advisory services to assist in determining the reasonableness of capital expenditures for a telephone corporation, the commission may adjust the fees within the class so that the expenses for the consultants and advisory services are fully allocated to that telephone corporation.

(4) For water and sewer system corporations, the ratio that each corporation’s gross intrastate revenues bears to the total gross intrastate revenues for the class.

(5) For all other public utilities, an appropriate measurement methodology determined by the commission.

(d) Every public utility belonging to more than one class shall be subject to the fee for each class of which it is a member.

(e) For every public utility with annual gross intrastate revenues of seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000) or less, the commission shall annually establish uniform fees to be paid by each such public utility, if the revenues collected thereby are consistent with paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) and subdivision (c).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1035, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

433.

Except as provided in Section 404, every public utility subject to Section 431 shall make payment of the required fee in accordance with the following schedule:

(a) Every public utility with annual gross intrastate revenues of seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000) or less shall make payment of the fee to the commission on an annual basis on or before January 15.

(b) Every other public utility not subject to subdivision (a) shall make payment of the fee to the commission on a quarterly basis between the first and 15th days of July, October, January, and April.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 323, Sec. 71.   Effective July 1, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

434.

(a) The commission may require every public utility subject to this article to furnish information and reports to the commission, at the time or times it specifies, to enable it to make the allocations pursuant to Section 432.

(b) Any public utility required to submit information and reports under this article may, in lieu thereof, submit information or reports made to any other governmental agency if all of the following are met:

(1) The alternate information or reports contain all of the information required by the commission.

(2) The requirements to which the alternate reports or information are responsive are clearly identified.

(3) The information or reports are certified by the public utility to be true and correct.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 323, Sec. 71.   Effective July 1, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

435.

As used in this article:

(a) “Class” means a group of public utilities as specified by the commission for purposes of establishing fees pursuant to this article. The commission shall create separate classes for the following: electrical corporations, gas corporations, heat corporations, water corporations, sewer system corporations, and telephone and telegraph corporations.

(b) “Fee” means that monetary amount determined in accordance with this article.

(c) “Gross intrastate revenues” means those revenues from a public utility subject to the jurisdiction of the commission and accounted for according to the uniform system of accounts maintained by the commission. For purposes of this article, the amount of gross intrastate revenues of a public utility subject to the jurisdiction of the commission shall be the gross intrastate operating revenues set forth in the annual report of the public utility to the commission.

(d) “Sales in kilowatt hours” means sales in kilowatt hours, subject to the jurisdiction of the commission, for service directly to customers and subscribers of each electrical corporation, and shall not include interdepartmental sales or transfers and sales to other privately owned or publicly owned public utilities furnishing electricity.

(e) “Sales in therms” means deliveries of gas in therms, without regard to ownership of the gas, subject to the jurisdiction of the commission, directly to customers and subscribers of each gas corporation, except interdepartmental sales or transfers and sales to other privately owned or publicly owned public utilities furnishing electricity, gas, or heat.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1035, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Video Service Franchises [440. - 444.]

440.

(a) For purposes of this article, “state franchise,” “video service,” and “video service provider” shall have the same meaning as those terms are defined in Section 5830.

(b) The Public Utilities Commission Video Franchising Account is hereby created in the Public Utilities Commission Utilities Reimbursement Account.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 700, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

441.

The commission shall annually determine a fee to be paid by an applicant or holder of a state franchise pursuant to Division 2.5 (commencing with Section 5800). The annual fee shall be established to produce a total amount equal to that amount established in the authorized commission budget for the same year, including adjustments for increases in employee compensation, other increases appropriated by the Legislature, and an appropriate reserve to carry out the provisions of Division 2.5 (commencing with Section 5800), less the amount to be paid from reimbursements, federal funds, and any other revenues, and the amount of unencumbered funds from the preceding year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 700, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

442.

(a) The commission shall establish the fee pursuant to Section 441 with the approval of the Department of Finance. The commission shall specify the amount of its budget to be financed by the fee in its annual budget request.

(b) The fee shall be determined and imposed by the commission consistent with the requirements of Section 542 of Title 47 of the United States Code.

(c) All fees collected by the commission pursuant to this section shall be transmitted to the Treasurer at least quarterly for deposit in the Public Utilities Commission Video Franchising Account.

(d) The commission shall maintain those records as are necessary to account separately for all fees and charges, including the fees authorized by Section 441.

(e) The commission shall authorize refunds of the fees provided for in this article when the fees were collected in error.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 700, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

443.

(a) The commission may require a video service provider subject to this article to furnish information and reports to the commission, at the time or times it specifies, to enable it to determine the fee pursuant to Section 441.

(b) Any video service provider required to submit information and reports under this article may, in lieu thereof, submit information or reports made to any other governmental agency if all of the following are met:

(1) The alternate information or reports contain all of the information required by the commission.

(2) The requirements to which the alternate reports or information are responsive are clearly identified.

(3) The information or reports are certified by the video service provider to be true and correct.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 700, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

444.

(a) If a video service provider subject to this article is in default of the payment of any fee required by this article for a period of 30 days or more, the commission may suspend or revoke the state franchise of the video service provider or order the video service provider to cease and desist from conducting all operations subject to the franchising authority of the commission. The commission may estimate from all available information the appropriate fee and may add to the amount of that estimated fee, a penalty not to exceed 25 percent of the amount, on account of the failure, refusal, or neglect to prepare and submit the report or to pay the fee, and the video service provider shall be estopped to complain of the amount of the commission’s estimate.

(b) Upon payment of the fee so estimated and penalty, if applicable, the state franchise of the video service provider suspended in accordance with this section shall be reinstated or the order to cease and desist revoked. The commission may grant a reasonable extension of the 30-day period to any video service provider upon written application and a showing of the necessity of the extension.

(c) Upon revocation of any state franchise or issuance of an order to cease and desist pursuant to this section, all fees in default shall become due and payable immediately.

(d) The commission may bring an action, in its own name or in the name of the people of the state, in any court of competent jurisdiction, for the collection of delinquent fees estimated under this article, or for an amount due, owing, and unpaid to it, as shown by report filed by the commission, together with a penalty of 25 percent for the delinquency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 700, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Rights and Obligations of Public Utilities [451. - 666.]



  ARTICLE 1. Rates [451. - 468.]

451.

All charges demanded or received by any public utility, or by any two or more public utilities, for any product or commodity furnished or to be furnished or any service rendered or to be rendered shall be just and reasonable. Every unjust or unreasonable charge demanded or received for such product or commodity or service is unlawful.

Every public utility shall furnish and maintain such adequate, efficient, just, and reasonable service, instrumentalities, equipment, and facilities, including telephone facilities, as defined in Section 54.1 of the Civil Code, as are necessary to promote the
 safety, health, comfort, and convenience of its patrons, employees, and the public.

All rules made by a public utility affecting or pertaining to its charges or service to the public shall be just and reasonable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 700.)
-------------------------------------------

451.1.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Covered wildfire” has the same meaning as defined in Section 1701.8.

(2) “Wildfire Fund” means the Wildfire Fund created pursuant to Section 3284.

(b) When determining an application by an electrical corporation to recover costs and expenses arising from a covered wildfire, the commission shall allow cost recovery if the costs and expenses are just and reasonable. Costs and expenses arising from a covered wildfire are just and reasonable if the conduct of the electrical corporation related to the ignition was consistent with actions that a reasonable
 utility would have undertaken in good faith under similar circumstances, at the relevant point in time, and based on the information available to the electrical corporation at the relevant point in time. Reasonable conduct is not limited to the optimum practice, method, or act to the exclusion of others, but rather encompasses a spectrum of possible practices, methods, or acts consistent with utility system needs, the interest of the ratepayers, and the requirements of governmental agencies of competent jurisdiction. Costs and expenses in the application may be allocated for cost recovery in full or in part taking into account factors both within and beyond the utility’s control that may have exacerbated the costs and expenses, including humidity, temperature, and winds.

(c) An electrical corporation bears the burden to demonstrate, based on a preponderance of the evidence, that its conduct was reasonable pursuant to subdivision (b) unless it
 has a valid safety certification pursuant to Section 8389 for the time period in which the covered wildfire that is the subject of the application ignited. If the electrical corporation has received a valid safety certification for the time period in which the covered wildfire ignited, an electrical corporation’s conduct shall be deemed to have been reasonable pursuant to subdivision (b) unless a party to the proceeding creates a serious doubt as to the reasonableness of the electrical corporation’s conduct. Once serious doubt has been raised, the electrical corporation has the burden of dispelling that doubt and proving the conduct to have been reasonable.

(d) If an electrical corporation has drawn amounts from the Wildfire Fund for eligible claims for a covered wildfire, then the electrical corporation shall file an application to recover costs and expenses pursuant to Section 1701.8 after it has paid substantially all third-party liability
 claims arising from the covered wildfire.

(e) Notwithstanding Section 451, this section shall direct the commission’s evaluation of applications for recovery of costs and expenses arising from a covered wildfire. This section shall not apply to any other applications for cost recovery.

(f) This section shall not affect any civil action, appeal, or other action or proceeding.

(g) This section shall become inoperative if Section 3292 becomes inoperative pursuant to subdivision (k) of that section and this section shall be repealed on the first January 1 more than three months after this section becomes inoperative. The commission shall notify the Secretary of State as to whether this section becomes inoperative and is repealed.
